lexc/noun/enhufnspec.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter

!+Sue
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §VVSZ§ §VVC§ §VVK§ §VVKOT§ §NNn§ §RRr§ §oeoez12§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 


      
LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! s végű. s-szal
LEXICON AddNounsz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posssz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plursz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famsz;

LEXICON Posssz
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famsz;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famsz;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famsz;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famsz;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famsz;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famsz;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famsz;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famsz;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famsz;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famsz;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famsz;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famsz;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famsz;

LEXICON Plursz
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gensz;
                            Gensz;
        
LEXICON Famsz
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gensz;
                       Gensz;

LEXICON Gensz
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casesz;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casesz;
                       Casesz;
 
LEXICON Casesz
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVSZ§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVSZ§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! c végű c-kal
LEXICON AddNounc
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possc;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurc;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famc;

LEXICON Possc
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famc;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famc;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famc;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famc;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famc;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famc;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famc;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famc;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famc;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famc;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famc;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famc;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famc;

LEXICON Plurc
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genc;
                            Genc;
        
LEXICON Famc
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genc;
                       Genc;

LEXICON Genc
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casec;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casec;
                       Casec;
 
LEXICON Casec
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVC§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVC§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! c vágű basic-kot
LEXICON AddNounk
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possk;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurk;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famk;

LEXICON Possk
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famk;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famk;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famk;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famk;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famk;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famk;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famk;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famk;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famk;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famk;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famk;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famk;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famk;

LEXICON Plurk
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genk;
                            Genk;
        
LEXICON Famk
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genk;
                       Genk;

LEXICON Genk
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casek;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casek;
                       Casek;
 
LEXICON Casek
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVK§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVK§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! többes számú Hebridák
LEXICON AddNountsz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posstsz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurtsz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famtsz;

LEXICON Noun
Aeneas AddNounsz;
Aires AddNounsz;
Alpok AddNountsz;
Amazonas AddNounsz;
Andok AddNountsz;
Angeles AddNounsz;
Anonymus AddNounsz;
Antillák AddNountsz;
Antoninus AddNounsz;
Antonius AddNounsz;
Appenninek AddNountsz;
Arkansas AddNounsz;
Augustus AddNounsz;
Babes AddNounsz;
Bacchus AddNounsz;
Banglades AddNounsz;
Barbados AddNounsz;
Barents AddNounsz;
Basic AddNounk;
Benz AddNounc;
Brahms AddNounsz;
Brontosaurus AddNounsz;
Buenos AddNounsz;
Calc AddNounk;
Caracas AddNounsz;
Catullus AddNounsz;
Celsius AddNounsz;
Cerberus AddNounsz;
Cervantes AddNounsz;
Charles AddNounsz;
Claudius AddNounsz;
Claus AddNounsz;
Comenius AddNounsz;
Coriolis AddNounsz;
Dallas AddNounsz;
Danubius AddNounsz;
Dardanellák AddNountsz;
Dickens AddNounsz;
Egis AddNounsz;
Engels AddNounsz;
Erasmus AddNounsz;
Erazmus AddNounsz;
Galápagos AddNounsz;
Graz AddNounc;
Hadrianus AddNounsz;
Hebridák AddNountsz;
Herz AddNounc;
Holmes AddNounsz;
Honduras AddNounsz;
Horatius AddNounsz;
Huygens AddNounsz;
Ikarus AddNounsz;
James AddNounsz;
Janus AddNounsz;
Julianus AddNounsz;
Keats AddNounsz;
Konfucius AddNounsz;
Kárpátok AddNountsz;
Lagos AddNounsz;
Leibniz AddNounc;
Linz AddNounc;
Livius AddNounsz;
Lucullus AddNounsz;
Lódz AddNounc;
Malthus AddNounsz;
Massachusetts AddNounsz;
Mauritius AddNounsz;
Mercedes AddNounsz;
Möbius AddNounsz;
Nautilus AddNounsz;
Orleans AddNounsz;
Ovidius AddNounsz;
Palatinus AddNounsz;
Pannonius AddNounsz;
Paracelsus AddNounsz;
Parnasszus AddNounsz;
Pegazus AddNounsz;
Philips AddNounsz;
Pireneusok AddNountsz;
Pius AddNounsz;
Plinius AddNounsz;
Poncius AddNounsz;
Québec AddNounk;
Remus AddNounsz;
Romulus AddNounsz;
Rubens AddNounsz;
Semmelweis AddNounsz;
Siemens AddNounsz;
Spartacus AddNounsz;
Spitzbergák AddNountsz;
Stokes AddNounsz;
Strauss AddNounsz;
Szudéták AddNountsz;
Tacitus AddNounsz;
Texas AddNounsz;
Thomas AddNounsz;
Tiberus AddNounsz;
Times AddNounsz;
Torvalds AddNounsz;
Traianus AddNounsz;
Tyrannosaurus AddNounsz;
Vegas AddNounsz;
Vergilius AddNounsz;
Vilnius AddNounsz;
Vogézek AddNountsz;
Wales AddNounsz;
Wells AddNounsz;
Windows AddNounsz;
altocumulus AddNounsz;
altostratus AddNounsz;
cirrocumulus AddNounsz;
cirrostratus AddNounsz;
cirrus AddNounsz;
cumulonimbus AddNounsz;
cumulus AddNounsz;
háromkirályok AddNountsz;
nimbostratus AddNounsz;
opus AddNounsz;
stratocumulus AddNounsz;
vegyiművek AddNountsz;
